Arkansas, session 2025, HB1947.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-64-443(a), concerning the possession of
drug paraphernalia, is amended to read as follows:
(a) A person who possesses drug paraphernalia with the purpose to use
the drug paraphernalia to inject, ingest, inhale, or otherwise introduce into
the human body a controlled substance or to store, contain, conceal, or weigh
a controlled substance in violation of this chapter upon conviction is guilty
of:
(1) A Class A misdemeanor; or An unclassified misdemeanor
punishable by imprisonment for not less than twenty-four (24) hours but no
more than one (1) year and a fine not less than one hundred fifty dollars
($150) but no more than one thousand dollars ($1,000); or
(2) A Class D felony if the:
(A) Controlled If the controlled substance is
methamphetamine, heroin, fentanyl, or cocaine; and:
(B) Person has been previously convicted of a violation of
this chapter
(A) For a first offense, an unclassified misdemeanor
*CEB097*
04/01/2025 9:30:50 AM CEB097

HB1947
punishable by imprisonment for not less than twenty-four (24) hours but no
more than one (1) year and a fine not less than one hundred fifty dollars
($150) but no more than one thousand dollars ($1,000);
(B) For a second offense occurring within ten (10) years
of the first offense, an unclassified misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment
for not less than seven (7) days but no more than one (1) year and a fine not
less than four hundred dollars ($400) but no more than three thousand dollars
($3,000);
(C) For a third offense occurring within ten (10) years of
the first offense, an unclassified misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for
not less than ninety (90) days but no more than one (1) year and a fine not
less than nine hundred dollars ($900) but no more than five thousand dollars
($5,000); or
(D) For a fourth or subsequent offense occurring within
ten (10) years of the first offense, an unclassified felony punishable by
imprisonment for not less than one (1) year but no more than six (6) years
and a fine not less than nine hundred dollars ($900) but no more than five
thousand dollars ($5,000).


















04/01/2025 9:30:50 AM CEB097